Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7874.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 34 of the General Laws entitled "PROPERTY" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 36.2
OVERSIGHT AND REGULATION OF MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES
34-36.2-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Oversight and Regulation of
Management Committees Act”.
34-36.2-2. Applicability.
This chapter shall apply to any and all management committees in existence on or after
July 1, 2026.
34-36.2-3. Definitions.
The following terms and phrases are defined as follows:
(1) “Annual registration” means that registration required by § 34-36.2-4.
(2) “Condominium project” shall be defined as provided in § 34-36-3.
(3) “Department” means the department of business regulation.
(4) “Director” means the director of the department of business regulation.
(5) “Management committee” shall be defined as provided in § 34-36-3.
(6) "Property management company" means a person or entity hired by the management

committee to manage operations.
(7) “Unit owner” shall be defined as provided in § 34-36.1-1.03.
34-36.2-4. Registration of management committees.
Each management committee or its property management company shall file an annual
registration with the department, a copy of which shall be filed with the office of land records for
the municipality in which the condominium project is located. The annual registration shall include:
(1) Names and addresses of board members;
(2) Name of any property management company;
(3) Most recent annual budget;
(4) Most recent reserve study, if any; and
(5) A listing of any and all pending litigation in which the property management company,
management committee, or any board member in his or her capacity as a member of the
management committee, is involved.
34-36.2-5. Duties.
(a) Members of the management committee and/or agents of the property management
company shall exercise the duties of good faith and loyalty in relation to unit owners.
(b) Members of the management committee and/or agents of the property management
company are prohibited from:
(1) Failing, within a reasonable time, to account for or remit any monies coming into its
possession which belong to unit owners;
(2) Conviction in a court of competent jurisdiction of this or any other state, of forgery,
embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, larceny, extortion, conspiracy to defraud,
or other like offense or offenses;
(3) Improperly commingling funds in an escrow or trustee account; or
(4) Commingling funds of different associations.
34-36.2-6. Transparency and access to records.
The management committee and/or property management company shall maintain
accurate financial and operational records of the condominium project, and unit owners shall have
the right to inspect and obtain copies of records related to the condominium project.
34-36.2-7. Complaints, investigations, and enforcement.
(a) A unit owner may file a complaint with the department regarding violations of this
chapter.
(b) In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the director may conduct investigations,
audits, or hearings as necessary; issue subpoenas; administer oaths; compel testimony; and order
LC003141 - Page 2 of 4

the production of books, records, and documents.
(c) If any person refuses to appear, to testify or produce any book, record, paper or
document when so ordered, upon application of the department, a judge of the superior court may
make such order as may be appropriate to aid in the enforcement of this section.
(d) The director may issue orders, fines, or corrective directives to ensure the compliance
of management committees and property management companies with this chapter; provided, the
director shall refer matters of a criminal nature to the office of the attorney general for investigation.
34-36.2-8. Rulemaking authority.
The department is authorized to adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this
chapter.
34-36.2-9. Interpretation.
The provisions of this chapter are intended to support, expand upon, and be consistent with
the provisions of chapter 36.1 of title 34 (“condominium law”). To the extent there are any express
conflicts between these chapters that cannot be resolved, the provisions of this chapter shall
supersede any conflicting provisions in chapter 36.1 of title 34.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003141
========
LC003141 - Page 3 of 4